Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1183.
do enact as follows:AB1183,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB1183,28Section 2. 20.255 (2) (bj) of the statutes is created to read:AB1183,2,11920.255 (2) (bj) Emergency notification systems grants. The amounts in the 10schedule for the grants for emergency notification systems for deaf and hard-of-11hearing pupils under s. 115.374. AB1183,312Section 3. 115.374 of the statutes is created to read:AB1183,2,2013115.374 Grants for emergency notification systems for deaf and hard-14of-hearing pupils. From the appropriation under s. 20.255 (2) (bj), the 15department shall establish a grant program to award grants to school districts that 16install an emergency notification system that is accessible to deaf and hard-of-17hearing pupils or upgrade an emergency notification system to make it accessible to 18deaf and hard-of-hearing pupils. The department may not award a grant under this 19section to a school district in an amount that exceeds the amount the school district 20expended in the installation or upgrade of an emergency notification system.AB1183,2,2121